Utah statutes.
17B-2a-821.   Failure to pay fare -- Infraction -- Multicounty district may establish and enforce parking ordinance.

(1)  A person may not ride a transit vehicle without payment of the applicable fare established by the public transit district that operates the transit vehicle.

(2)  A person who violates Subsection (1) is guilty of an infraction.

(3)  The board of trustees of a multicounty district may adopt an ordinance governing parking of vehicles at a transit facility, including the imposition of a fine or civil penalty for a violation of the ordinance.

